Utah statutes.
4-10-7.   Tagging requirements for bedding, upholstered furniture, and filling material.

(1) (a)  All bedding, upholstered furniture, and filling material shall be securely tagged by the manufacturer or repairer.

(b)  Tags shall be at least six square inches and plainly and indelibly labeled with:

(i)  information as the department requires by rule; and

(ii)  according to the filling material type, the words "All New Material," "Secondhand Material," or "Owner's Material," stamped or printed on the label.

(c)  Each label shall be placed on the article in such a position as to facilitate ease of examination.

(2) (a)  If more than one type of filling material is used, its component parts shall be listed in descending order by weight or by percentages.

(b)  If descriptive statements are made about the frame, cover, or style of the article, such statements shall, in fact, be true.

(c)  All quilted clothing shall be tagged and labeled in conformity with the Federal Textile Fiber Products Identification Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 70 through 70k.

(3)  No person, except the purchaser, may remove, deface, or alter a tag attached according to this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2007 General Session

